Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Chapter 8

Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway Development Compact

69-8-101. Compact authorized — Form.

The governor, on behalf of this state, is hereby authorized to execute a compact in substantially the form set forth in this section, with the states of Alabama and Mississippi and/or with states contiguous with either of these states, and the general assembly hereby signifies its approval and ratification of such compact, which shall be executed in substantially the following form when the general assemblies or the chief legislative bodies of the states of Alabama and Mississippi have approved the state of Tennessee to become a party to the compact, to wit:

TENNESSEE-TOMBIGBEE WATERWAY DEVELOPMENT COMPACT

ARTICLE I

The purpose of this compact is to promote the development of a navigable waterway connecting the Tennessee and Tombigbee Rivers by way of the east fork of the Tombigbee River and Mackeys and Yellow Creeks so as to provide a nine-foot navigable channel from the junction of the Tombigbee and Warrior Rivers at Demopolis in the state of Alabama to the junction of Yellow Creek with the Tennessee River at Pickwick pool in the state of Mississippi and to establish a joint inter-state authority to assist in these efforts.

ARTICLE II

This compact shall become effective immediately as to the states ratifying it whenever the states of Alabama and Mississippi have ratified it and congress has given consent thereto. Any state not mentioned in this article which is contiguous with any member state may become a party to this compact, subject to approval by the legislature of each of the member states.

ARTICLE III

The states which are parties to this compact (hereinafter referred to as “party states”) do hereby establish and create a joint agency which shall be known as the Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway Development Authority (hereinafter referred to as the “Authority”). The membership of the Authority shall consist of the governor of each party state and five (5) other citizens of each party state, to be appointed by the governor thereof. Each appointed member of the Authority shall be a citizen of that state who is interested in the promotion and development of waterways and water transportation. The appointive members of the Authority shall serve for terms of four (4) years each. Vacancies on the Authority shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired portion of the term. The members of the Authority shall not be compensated, but each shall be entitled to actual expenses incurred in attending meetings, or incurred otherwise in the performance of the member's duties as a member of the Authority. The members of the Authority shall hold regular quarterly meetings and such special meetings as its business may require. They shall choose annually a chair and vice chair from among their members, and the chair shall rotate each year among the party states in order of their acceptance of this compact. The secretary of the Authority (hereinafter provided for) shall notify each member in writing of all meetings of the Authority in such a manner and under such rules and regulations as the Authority may prescribe. The Authority shall adopt rules and regulations for the transaction of its business; and the secretary shall keep a record of all its business, and shall furnish a copy thereof to each member of the Authority. It shall be the duty of the Authority, in general, to promote, encourage, and coordinate the efforts of the party states to secure the development of the Tennessee-Tombigbee waterway. Toward this end, the Authority shall have power to hold hearings; to conduct studies and surveys of all problems, benefits, and other matters associated with the development of the Tennessee-Tombigbee waterway, and to make reports thereon; to acquire, by gift or otherwise, and hold and dispose of such money and property as may be provided for the proper performance of their functions; to cooperate with other public or private groups, whether local, state, regional, or national, having an interest in waterways development; to formulate and execute plans and policies for emphasizing the purpose of this compact before the Congress of the United States and other appropriate officials and agencies of the United States; and to exercise such other powers as may be appropriate to enable it to accomplish its functions and duties in connection with the development of the Tennessee-Tombigbee waterway and to carry out the purposes of this compact.

ARTICLE IV

The Authority shall appoint a secretary, who shall be a person familiar with the nature, procedures, and significances of inland waterways development and the informational, educational, and publicity methods of stimulating general interest in such developments, and who shall be the compact administrator. The secretary's term of office shall be at the pleasure of the Authority and the secretary shall receive such compensation as the Authority shall prescribe. The secretary shall maintain custody of the Authority's books, records, and papers, which the secretary shall keep in the office of the Authority, and the secretary shall perform all functions and duties, and exercise all powers and authorities that may be delegated to the secretary by the Authority.

ARTICLE V

Nothing in this compact shall be construed so as to conflict with any existing statute, or to limit the powers of any party state, or to repeal or prevent legislation, or to authorize or permit curtailment or diminution of any other waterway project, or to affect any existing or future cooperative arrangement or relationship between any federal agency and a party state.

ARTICLE VI

This compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each party state until the general assembly or governor of each or either state takes action to withdraw therefrom; provided that such withdrawal shall not become effective until six (6) months after the date of the action taken by the general assembly or governor. Notice of such action shall be given to the other party state or states by the secretary of state of the party state which takes such action.

Acts 1959, ch. 55, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-2101; T.C.A. §69-9-101.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee-Tombigbee waterway development authority, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

69-8-102. Execution of compact — When effective.

When the governor has executed this compact on behalf of this state and has caused a verified copy of the compact to be filed with the secretary of state, and when the compact has been ratified as provided in Article II of the compact, and when the general assemblies or the chief legislative bodies of the states of Alabama and Mississippi have approved Tennessee as a compacting state, then it shall become operative and effective as between this state and such other states, and the governor is hereby authorized and directed to take such action as may be necessary to complete the exchange of official documents between this state and any other state ratifying the compact. All documents relating to the compact shall be filed with the secretary of state.

Acts 1959, ch. 55, § 2; T.C.A., § 70-2102; T.C.A. §69-9-102.

69-8-103. Administration of compact — Powers granted — Members of authority.

There is hereby granted to the governor, to the members of the authority of Tennessee, and to the compact administrator, all powers provided for in the compact and in this chapter. All officers of the state of Tennessee are hereby authorized and directed to do all things falling within their respective jurisdictions that are necessary or incidental to carrying out the purpose of the compact. Those citizens representing this state on the authority shall be selected by the governor as follows: One (1) from west Tennessee, one (1) from middle Tennessee, one (1) from east Tennessee, and two (2) from the state at large.

Acts 1959, ch. 55, § 3; T.C.A., § 70-2103; T.C.A. §69-9-103.

69-8-104. Unlawful to obligate state in excess of appropriation for biennium.

It is unlawful for any member of the authority representing the state of Tennessee either to make any agreement or to create any obligation or to commit the state for any funds, moneys, or property in excess of the amounts on hand or the amount of the appropriation for the biennium, or either. Any such agreement, obligation, or commitment shall be null and void. Such agreements, obligations, or commitments shall be approved by the attorney general and reporter prior to their execution by the proper officials of the state of Tennessee.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1959, ch. 55, § 4; T.C.A., § 70-2104; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; T.C.A. §69-9-104.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.